test/src/gt-norm-yamls/smj-tests-from-old-infra_gt-norm.yaml
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: bednagijnám
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijnátga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijnátge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijnátgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: bednagijnát
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijnesga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijnesge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijnesgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: bednagijnes
    bena+N+Pl+Ine: bednagijn
    # bena+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/ga: bednagaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/ge: [bednagage, bednagak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gen: bednagagen
    bena+N+Pl+Nom: bednaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/ga: [bednagatagága, bednagadagiga, bednagadagága]
    # bena+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/ge: [bednagatagáge, bednagatagák, bednagadagige, bednagadagik, bednagadagáge, bednagadagák]
    # bena+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/gen: [bednagatagágen, bednagadagigen, bednagadagágen]
    bena+N+Sg+Abe: [bednagatagá, bednagadagi, bednagadagá]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/ga: bednagavga
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/ge: bednagavge
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/gen: bednagavgen
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagimmega
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagimmegen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: bednagimme
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagihttega
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagihttegen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: bednagihtte
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagiskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagiskage, bednagiskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagiskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: bednagiska
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagimmega
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagimmegen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: bednagimme
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagihttega
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagihttegen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: bednagihtte
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagisága
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagiságe, bednagisák]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagiságen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: bednagisá
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/ga: [bednagamga, bednagimga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [bednagamge, bednagimge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/gen: [bednagamgen, bednagimgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [bednagam, bednagim]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/ga: [bednagatga, bednagitga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/ge: [bednagatge, bednagitge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/gen: [bednagatgen, bednagitgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: [bednagat, bednagit]
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagisga
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagisge
    # bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagisgen
    bena+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: bednagis
    bena+N+Sg+Acc: bednagav
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+Foc/ga: [bednagijnaga, bednagijnga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+Foc/ge: [bednagijnage, bednagijnak, bednagijnge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gen: [bednagijnagen, bednagijngen]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijnemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijnemage, bednagijnemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijnemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu1: bednagijnema
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijnedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijnedage, bednagijnedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijnedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu2: bednagijneda
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijneskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijneskage, bednagijneskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijneskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxDu3: bednagijneska
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijnemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijnemage, bednagijnemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijnemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: bednagijnema
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijnedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijnedage, bednagijnedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijnedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: bednagijneda
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijnesaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijnesage, bednagijnesak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijnesagen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: bednagijnesa
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijnámga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijnámge
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijnámgen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bednagijnám
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijnátga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijnátge
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijnátgen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: bednagijnát
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijnesga
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijnesge
    # bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijnesgen
    bena+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: bednagijnes
    bena+N+Sg+Com: [bednagijna, bednagijn]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/ga: bednagisga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/ge: bednagisge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gen: bednagisgen
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagistemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagistemage, bednagistemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagistemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu1: bednagistema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagistedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagistedage, bednagistedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagistedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2: bednagisteda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagisteskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagisteskage, bednagisteskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagisteskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu3: bednagisteska
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagistemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagistemage, bednagistemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagistemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: bednagistema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagistedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagistedage, bednagistedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagistedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: bednagisteda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagistesaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagistesage, bednagistesak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagistesagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: bednagistesa
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagistámga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagistámge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagistámgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: bednagistám
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagistátga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagistátge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagistátgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: bednagistát
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagistesga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagistesge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagistesgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: bednagistes
    bena+N+Sg+Ela: bednagis
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/ga: bednagaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/ge: [bednagage, bednagak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gen: bednagagen
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagimmega
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagimmegen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bednagimme
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagihttega
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagihttegen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: bednagihtte
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagiskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagiskage, bednagiskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagiskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: bednagiska
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagimmega
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagimmege, bednagimmek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagimmegen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: bednagimme
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagihttega
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagihttege, bednagihttek]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagihttegen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: bednagihtte
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagisága
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagiságe, bednagisák]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagiságen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: bednagisá
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/ga: [bednagamga, bednagimga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [bednagamge, bednagimge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/gen: [bednagamgen, bednagimgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [bednagam, bednagim]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/ga: [bednagatga, bednagitga]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/ge: [bednagatge, bednagitge]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/gen: [bednagatgen, bednagitgen]
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: [bednagat, bednagit]
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagisga
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagisge
    # bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagisgen
    bena+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: bednagis
    bena+N+Sg+Gen: bednaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/ga: bednagijga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/ge: bednagijge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gen: bednagijgen
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagasemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagasemage, bednagasemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagasemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu1: bednagasema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagasedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagasedage, bednagasedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagasedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: bednagaseda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagaseskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagaseskage, bednagaseskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagaseskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu3: bednagaseska
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagasemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagasemage, bednagasemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagasemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: bednagasema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagasedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagasedage, bednagasedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagasedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: bednagaseda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagasesaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagasesage, bednagasesak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagasesagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: bednagasesa
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagasámga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagasámge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagasámgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: bednagasám
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagasátga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagasátge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagasátgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: bednagasát
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagasesga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagasesge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagasesgen
    bena+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: bednagases
    bena+N+Sg+Ill: bednagij
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/ga: bednaginga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/ge: bednaginge
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gen: bednagingen
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednaginemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednaginemage, bednaginemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednaginemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu1: bednaginema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednaginedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednaginedage, bednaginedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednaginedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu2: bednagineda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagineskaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagineskage, bednagineskak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagineskagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3: bednagineska
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednaginemaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednaginemage, bednaginemak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednaginemagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: bednaginema
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednaginedaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednaginedage, bednaginedak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednaginedagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: bednagineda
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednaginesaga
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednaginesage, bednaginesak]
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednaginesagen
    bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: bednaginesa
    # bena+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednaginámga
